Utah statutes.
34A-2-404.   Injuries to minors.

(1)  A minor is considered sui juris for the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, and no other person shall have any cause of action or right to compensation for an injury to the minor employee.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), in the event of the award of a lump sum of compensation to a minor employee, the sum shall be paid only to the minor's legally appointed guardian.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

